Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-621
Freeway, defined.

Freeway shall mean a divided arterial highway designed primarily for through traffic with full control of access and with grade separations at all intersecting road crossings, including all interchanges and approach and exit roads thereto.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 117.